Georgia statutes. TITLE 18 Debtor and Creditor
Article 2 Continuing Garnishment Proceedings

18-4-40.
Right to continuing garnishment process; applicable provisions.

In addition to garnishment proceedings otherwise available under this chapter, in all cases when a money judgment was obtained in a court of this state or a federal court or is being enforced in this state as provided in Article 5 of Chapter 12 of Title 9, the “Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act,” or Article 6 of Chapter 12 of Title 9, the “Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Law,” a plaintiff shall be entitled to the process of continuing garnishment against any garnishee who is an employer of or under periodic obligations for payment to the defendant against whom the judgment has been obtained.

Unless otherwise specifically provided in this article, Article 1 of this chapter shall apply to this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 19/SB 443.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “or under periodic obligations for payment to” near the end of subsection (a).

18-4-41.
Affidavit of continuing garnishment; summons; notice of exemptions; form.

In addition to the information required by subsection (a) of Code Section 18-4-3, an affidavit of continuing garnishment shall state that the plaintiff believes that the garnishee is or may be an employer of or under periodic obligations for payment to the defendant and subject to continuing garnishment.

Only one summons of continuing garnishment shall issue on one affidavit of continuing garnishment.

The plaintiff shall serve a summons of continuing garnishment and provide notice of exemptions in the same manner as provided for in Code Section 18-4-8.

The form for an affidavit of continuing garnishment is set forth in Code Section 18-4-72. The form for a summons of continuing garnishment is set forth in Code Section 18-4-78, and the optional attachment thereto is set forth in Code Section 18-4-79.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 20/SB 443.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “or under periodic obligations for payment to” near the end of subsection (a).

Law reviews.

For article with annual survey on labor and employment law, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 137 (2021).

18-4-42.
Filing and contents of summons of continuing garnishment; filing of subsequent answers.

As used in this Code section, the term “previous garnishee answer date” means the date upon which the immediately preceding garnishee answer was filed.

If the garnishee owes the defendant any sum for wages earned as the garnishee’s employee or any sum for goods or services periodically provided to the garnishee, the garnishee answer shall state specifically when the sum was earned by the defendant, whether the sum was earned on a daily, weekly, or monthly basis, any rate of pay and hours worked, and the basis for computation of earnings.

The summons of continuing garnishment shall be directed to the garnishee, commanding and obligating the garnishee:

To file a first garnishee answer with the court issuing such summons not sooner than 30 days and not later than 45 days after service of the summons of continuing garnishment, for the period of time from the date of service through and including the day of the first garnishee answer;

To file subsequent garnishee answers with such court for the remaining period covered by the summons of continuing garnishment; and

To send any money subject to continuing garnishment concurrently with each garnishee answer.

Subsequent garnishee answers shall be filed not later than 45 days after the previous garnishee answer date stating what money of the defendant is subject to continuing garnishment from the previous garnishee answer date through and including the date on which the next garnishee answer is filed.

The summons of continuing garnishment shall state that if the garnishee fails to file a garnishee’s answer to such summons in a timely manner, a judgment by default shall be entered against the garnishee for the amount remaining due on a judgment as shown in the plaintiff’s affidavit of continuing garnishment.

If the employment relationship or obligation for periodic payment between the garnishee and the defendant does not exist at the time of service of the summons of continuing garnishment, the garnishee shall state in the garnishee answer that such relationship does not exist and may immediately file the garnishee’s answer; provided, however, that such garnishee’s answer shall be filed not later than 45 days after service of the summons of continuing garnishment.

If the employment relationship or obligation for periodic payment between the garnishee and the defendant terminates on or after service of the summons of continuing garnishment, the garnishee shall state in the garnishee answer that such relationship has been terminated, giving the date of termination, and may immediately file the garnishee’s answer; provided, however, that such garnishee’s answer shall be filed not later than 45 days after service of the summons of continuing garnishment or 45 days after the previous garnishee answer date, whichever is later.

If, on or after service of the summons of continuing garnishment, the most recent two preceding garnishee answers filed at least 30 days apart advise that no payments are owed the defendant, the garnishee may elect to file a final garnishee answer, identified as such; provided, however, that such garnishee’s answer shall be filed not later than 45 days after service of the summons of continuing garnishment or 45 days after the previous garnishee answer date, whichever is later.

When a garnishee answer is made pursuant to subsection (f) of this Code section, no claim has been filed, and no traverse has been filed within 20 days after such garnishee answer is served on the plaintiff, the garnishee shall be discharged from further liability and obligation in the same manner as set forth under Code Section 18-4-20 for that summons with respect to the period of continuing garnishment remaining after the employment or periodic payment relationship is terminated, or a final garnishee answer is filed.

The form for a garnishee’s answer to a continuing garnishment is set forth in Code Section 18-4-86.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 21/SB 443.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (b), inserted “or any sum for goods or services periodically provided to the garnishee”, substituted “sum was” for “wages were” twice, and substituted “any rate” for “the rate”; inserted “and obligating” in subsection (c); in paragraph (c)(3), substituted “send” for “accompany all such garnishee answers with” and added “concurrently with each garnishee answer”; deleted the paragraph (d)(1) designation; deleted former paragraphs (d)(2) and (d)(3), which read: “(2) Subsequent garnishee answers shall not be required on a summons of continuing garnishment if the preceding garnishee answer filed states what money of the defendant is subject to continuing garnishment from the previous garnishee answer date to and including the one hundred seventy-ninth day after service of the summons of continuing garnishment.

“(3) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this subsection, the last garnishee answer shall be filed not later than the one hundred ninety-fifth day after service of the summons of continuing garnishment.”; inserted “or obligation for periodic payment” in paragraph (f)(1); deleted former paragraph (f)(2), which read: “When the defendant has been an employee of the garnishee, and if the defendant is no longer employed by the garnishee, the garnishee may immediately file the garnishee’s answer; provided, however, that such garnishee’s answer shall be filed not later than 45 days after service of the summons of continuing garnishment.”; redesignated former paragraph (f)((3) as present paragraph (f)(2); in paragraph (f)(2), inserted “or obligation for periodic payment” and added “or 45 days after the previous garnishee answer date, whichever is later”; added paragraph (f)(3); deleted former paragraph (f)(4), which read: “Upon the termination of employment of the defendant by the garnishee, the garnishee shall be required to file a final garnishee answer stating the date of the defendant’s termination”; and, in subsection (g), substituted “served on the plaintiff,” for “filed”, inserted “or periodic payment”, and added “, or a final garnishee answer is filed”.

18-4-43.
Default judgment against garnishee in continuing garnishment; relief from default.

When a garnishee fails or refuses to file a garnishee answer at least once every 45 days, such garnishee shall automatically be in default. The default may be opened as provided in Code Section 18-4-21. If the case is still in default after the expiration of the period of 15 days, judgment by default may be entered at any time thereafter against such garnishee for the amount remaining due on the judgment obtained against the defendant as shown in the plaintiff’s affidavit of continuing garnishment.

A garnishee may obtain relief from a default judgment upon the same conditions as provided in Code Section 18-4-24.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255.